California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
The public member shall serve a term of three years and shall remain on the commission after the expiration of three years until his or her successor is qualified and appointed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75064.

(a) The commission shall be and is hereby declared and created as a corporate body.

(b) It may sue and be sued, may contract and be contracted with, and has all of the powers of a corporation. It may adopt a corporate seal.

(c) Copies of its proceedings, records, and acts, when authenticated, shall be admissible in evidence in all courts of the state and shall be prima facie evidence of the truth of all statements therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75065.

A quorum of the commission is five voting commissioners. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the commission may act by a vote of a majority of the members present at a meeting at which there is a quorum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75066.

The director or his or her representatives shall be notified of, and may attend, each meeting of the commission and any committee meeting of the commission. However, the director or his or her representative or any other ex officio member is not entitled to attend an executive session of the commission called for the purpose of discussing potential or actual litigation involving either the department or the organization represented by the ex officio member, as the case may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75067.

When a decision of the commission requires the concurrence of the director, he or she shall indicate his or her response, in writing, to the commission within 15 working days from notification of the decision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75068.

(a) No commissioner, including alternates, or a member of a committee established by the commission who is a nonmember of the commission, shall receive a salary.

(b) Each commissioner and alternate, except ex officio governmental members, and each member of a committee who is a nonmember of the commission, may receive a sum of not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day, as established by the commission, for each day spent in actual attendance at, or in traveling to and from, meetings of the commission or committees or on special assignment for the commission, as approved by the commission, together with the necessary traveling expenses and meal allowances, as approved by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75069.

(a) All funds received by any person from the assessments levied under the authority of this chapter, or otherwise received by the commission, shall be deposited in the banks or other appropriate financial institutions designated by the commission and shall be disbursed by order of the commission through the agent or agents that it designated for that purpose.

(b) The agent or agents shall be bonded by a fidelity bond, executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in this state, in favor of the commission, in the amount of not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75070.

(a) The state shall not be liable for the acts of the commission or its contracts. Payments of all claims arising by reason of the administration of this chapter or acts of the commission are limited to the funds collected by the commission.

(b) No member of the commission or alternate member, or any employee or agent thereof, is personally liable on the contracts of the commission or responsible individually in any way to any producer, any handler, or any other person for error in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of commission or omission, as principal, agent, or employee, except for his or her own individual acts of dishonesty or crime.

(c) The commission shall accept full responsibility to defend any member of the commission or alternate member, or any employee or agent thereof, against any such claim, except for individual acts of dishonesty or crime.

(d) No commissioner or alternate member shall be held responsible individually for any act or omission of any other member of the commission. The liability of the commissioners are several and not joint, and no commissioner is liable for the default of any other commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 121, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers and Duties of the Commission [75081. - 75098.]

75081.

The powers and duties of the commission, subject to Sections 75054 and 75055, shall include, but are not limited to, all of the powers and duties specified in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75082.

The commission shall adopt and, from time to time, alter, rescind, modify, and amend in a manner prescribed by the commission, all proper and necessary bylaws, rules and regulations, and orders for carrying out this chapter, including rules for appeals from any bylaw, rule and regulation, or order of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75083.

The commission shall administer and enforce this chapter and perform all acts and exercise all powers incidental to, or in connection with, or deemed reasonably necessary for, the proper or advisable effectuation of the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75084.

The commission shall appoint its own officers, including a chairperson, one or more vice chairpersons, and other officers that it deems necessary.

The officers have the powers and duties delegated to them by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75085.

(a) The commission shall employ a person to serve at the pleasure of the commission as president and chief executive officer of the commission, and other personnel, including legal counsel, that are necessary to carry out this chapter.

(b) In lieu of an individual as president, the commission may contract with any private entity or state agency to perform, under the control of the commission, the functions specified in subdivision (a).

(c) If the president, private entity, or state agency engages in any conduct which the director determines is not in the public interest or which is in violation of this chapter, the director shall notify the commission of the conduct and request that corrective and, if appropriate, disciplinary action be taken by the commission. If the commission fails or refuses to correct the situation or to take disciplinary action satisfactory to the director, the director may suspend or discharge the president, private entity, or state agency, as the case may be.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 965, Sec. 5.   Effective September 10, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

75086.

The commission shall fix the compensation for all employees of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75087.

The commission may appoint committees which may be composed of both members and nonmembers of the commission to advise the commission in carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75088.

The commission may establish offices and incur expenses, enter into any and all contracts and agreements, create liabilities, and borrow funds in advance of receipt of assessments for that year, that may be necessary, in the opinion of the commission, for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter and the performance of its duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75089.

(a) The commission shall keep accurate books, records, and accounts of all of its dealings, which books, records, and accounts are subject to an annual audit by an auditing firm selected by the commission with the concurrence of the secretary. The audit shall be made a part of an annual report to all handlers and producers, copies of which shall also be submitted to the Legislature and the department.

(b) In addition, the secretary may, as he or she determines it to be necessary, conduct or cause to be conducted a fiscal and compliance audit of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1093, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

75090.

The commission shall promote the sale of eggs and egg products by advertising and other promotional means, including cost-sharing advertising, to maintain and expand present markets and create new and larger intrastate, interstate, and foreign markets for eggs and egg products, and to educate and instruct the public with respect to the uses, healthful properties, and nutritional value of eggs and egg products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75090.5.

(a) The commission may petition the secretary to adopt and administer any activity authorized by the California Marketing Act of 1937, Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 58601) of Part 2 of Division 21, relating to the commodity covered by the commission. Adoption and administration of the activity by the commission shall be in accordance with the act.

(b) As determined by the secretary, the governing body of the commission may serve as the advisory board to the secretary with respect to any activity recommended and approved pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 87.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

75091.

The commission shall educate and instruct the wholesale and retail trade with respect to proper methods of handling and marketing eggs and egg products, to make market surveys and analyses, and to present facts to, and negotiate with, private and public agencies on matters that affect the marketing of eggs and egg products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 454, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75092.

The commission may enter into contracts to render services in formulating and conducting plans, programs, and any other contracts and agreements that the commission decides are necessary to carry out the activities authorized under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75092.5.

The commission may accept contributions for the purpose of carrying out any activity consistent with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 965, Sec. 7.   Effective September 10, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

75093.

(a) The commission may conduct, and contract with others to conduct, marketing research, including the study, analysis, dissemination, and accumulation of information obtained from the research or from other sources regarding the marketing and distribution of eggs and egg products. In connection with the research, the commission is authorized to accept contributions of, or to match, private, state, or federal funds that may be available for these purposes, and to employ or make contributions of funds to other persons or state or federal agencies conducting this research.

(b) The commission may conduct research programs for the purpose of developing and testing new products in selected markets. Funds may be expended to develop the proposal; however, the proposed program shall be submitted to the director for approval prior to the expenditure of funds to implement the program. The proposal submitted shall include a description of the new products, the test market to be utilized, and the duration of the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 965, Sec. 8.   Effective September 10, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

75094.

The commission may publish and distribute, without charge, bulletins or other communications for dissemination of information relating to commission activities and other related matters to producers and handlers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1093, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

75095.

Pursuant to Section 75131, the commission shall establish an assessment rate to defray operating costs of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75096.

(a) The commission shall prepare an annual budget according to generally accepted accounting practices.

(b) Except for disbursements to pay the compensation of the employees of the commission, no disbursement of funds shall be made unless the director concurs in the budget.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75097.

The commission shall submit to the director, for his or her concurrence, an annual statement of contemplated activities authorized under this chapter, including advertising, promotion, and marketing research.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75098.

The commission may investigate and prosecute civil violations of this chapter and file complaints with appropriate law enforcement agencies or officers for criminal violation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Implementation and Voting Procedures [75111. - 75120.]

75111.

(a) Within 90 days after the effective date of this chapter, the director shall establish a list of handlers subject to the provisions of this chapter and who are otherwise eligible to vote on implementation of this chapter. In establishing this list, the director may require handlers, county agricultural commissioners, and others to submit the name and mailing address of, and the volume, if known, handled by each handler. The request for this information shall be in writing. The information required by the director shall be filed within 30 days following receipt of the written notice.

(b) Any handler, whose name does not appear upon the director’s list of handlers affected, may have his or her name included on the list by filing with the director a signed statement identifying himself or herself as a handler. Failure to be on this list does not exempt the handler from paying assessments under this chapter.

(c) Additionally, the director may use other sources of information necessary to secure that information to establish the list.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75112.

This chapter, except as necessary to conduct an implementation referendum, does not become operative until the director finds in a referendum conducted by him or her, or a person designated by the director, that at least 40 percent of the total number of handlers from the list established by the director pursuant to Section 75111, participated, and that he or she finds either one of the following:

(a) Sixty-five percent or more of the handlers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the handlers so voting handled a majority of the volume of eggs and egg products in the preceding season by all of the handlers who voted in the referendum.

(b) A majority of the handlers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the handlers so voting handled 65 percent or more of the volume of eggs and egg products in the preceding season by all of the handlers who voted in the referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 121, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

75113.

The director shall establish a period in which to conduct the referendum which shall not be less than 10 days or more than 60 days in duration, and may prescribe additional procedures as may be necessary to conduct the referendum. If the initial period established is less than 60 days, the director may extend the period. However, the total referendum period may not exceed 60 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75114.

Nonreceipt of a ballot does not invalidate a referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75115.

If the director finds that a favorable vote has been given as provided in Section 75112, he or she shall certify and give notice of the favorable vote, and that this chapter is operative, to all handlers whose names and addresses are on the list of the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75116.

If the director finds that a favorable vote has not been given as provided in Section 75112, he or she shall so certify and declare this chapter to be inoperative.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75117.

(a) Upon certification of the commission, as provided in Section 75115, the director shall, by mail ballot or by calling a meeting of all handlers, conduct the nomination and election of handlers to the commission.

(b) Handlers shall be given written notice of the meeting at least 15 days prior to the meeting date. Any handler doing business in more than one district shall designate in a manner prescribed by the commission, prior to any election, the district in which he or she will vote.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75118.

Subsequent to the first election of commissioners under this chapter, persons to be elected to the commission shall be selected pursuant to the nomination and election procedures established by the commission with the concurrence of the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75119.

(a) Prior to the implementation referendum conducted by the director pursuant to Section 75112, the proponents of the commission shall deposit with the director the amount that the director deems necessary to defray the expenses in creating the commission, including, but not limited to, preparing the necessary lists of handlers and conducting the implementation referendum.

(b) Any funds left after paying those expenses shall be returned to the proponents of the commission who deposited the funds with the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75120.

Upon creation of the commission, the commission is authorized to reimburse the proponents of the commission for any funds deposited with the director which were used in creating the commission, including, but not limited to, preparing the necessary lists of handlers and conducting the implementation referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Assessments and Records [75131. - 75137.]

75131.

(a) The assessment on eggs and egg products shall be established by the commission, with the approval of not less than five handler members, prior to the beginning of each marketing season and, except as provided in subdivision (c), shall not exceed one cent ($0.01) per dozen for shell eggs, or the equivalent thereof, as determined by the commission, for egg products.

(b) The commission may establish an assessment rate that is different for eggs than for egg products, so long as it does not exceed the maximum assessment authorized in subdivision (a).

(c) An assessment greater than the maximum specified in subdivision (a) may be charged but only if it is approved by a vote of the handlers as provided for in Section 75112.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 384, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

75131.3.

The assessment established pursuant to Section 75131 may be collected from out-of-state handlers in accordance with procedures established by the commission on eggs or egg products handled in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 121, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

75131.5.

Prior to the beginning of each marketing season and during the 1984 marketing season, the commission, with the concurrence of the director, may exempt the sale of specified eggs and egg products from an assessment if the commission determines that the activities supported by the assessment are inapplicable to the eggs and egg products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 965, Sec. 10.   Effective September 10, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

75132.

(a) This chapter does not apply to any person who handles not more than 26,000 cases of eggs per year, or the equivalent thereof, and to secondary handlers. Unless the commission determines otherwise, direct sales to customers on the premises of the handler in less than one case lots shall not be included in computing the number of cases handled per year and shall not be subject to assessment by the commission. However, the handler shall file an affidavit with the commission stating the basis for exemption from this chapter. The commission shall then determine whether the exemption should be approved.

(b) This chapter does not apply to any out-of-state handler who handles not more than 26,000 cases of eggs per year, or the equivalent thereof. However, upon the implementation of Section 75131.3, the commission may require the out-of-state handlers to file an affidavit with the commission stating the basis for exemption from this chapter. The commission shall then determine whether the exemption should be approved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1093, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

75133.

Every handler, and any person required to be registered pursuant to Section 75135.5, shall keep a complete and accurate record of all eggs and egg products handled by him or her. These records shall be in the form and contain the information prescribed by the commission. The records shall be retained for a period of five years and shall be submitted for inspection at any reasonable time upon written demand of the commission or its duly authorized agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 121, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

75134.

(a) All proprietary information obtained by the commission or the secretary from handlers is confidential and shall not be disclosed except when required by court order in a judicial proceeding involving this chapter.

(b) Information on volume shipments, product value, and any other related information that is required for reports to governmental agencies; financial reports to the commission or aggregate sales and inventory information; and any other information that the commission requires that gives only totals, but excludes individual handler information, may be disclosed by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1093, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

75135.

Assessments shall be levied upon the handler for all eggs and egg products handled by him or her that were not previously assessed by the commission. The handler of eggs and egg products being assessed shall be a trustee of the assessment funds until they are paid to the commission at the time and in the manner prescribed by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1093, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

75135.5.

Persons handling eggs or egg products in California which originated out of state, including persons shipping eggs or egg products into California, shall register with the commission in the manner prescribed by the commission, before handling eggs or egg products in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 121, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

75136.

Every handler is personally liable for the payment of the assessments. Any handler who fails to file records as prescribed by the commission or pay any assessment within the time required by the commission, shall pay to the commission a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the assessment determined to be due and, in addition, 2 percent interest per month on the unpaid balance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1093, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

75137.

(a) For any period during which the federal Egg Marketing Order (7 C.F. R. 994) and any resulting regulations are in effect and for which a federal assessment was paid in accordance with the order, the assessment collected by the commission pursuant to this chapter shall not exceed one-half cent ($0.005) per dozen shell eggs or the equivalent thereof.

(b) If the federal order is terminated, this section shall have no future force and effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 243, Sec. 11.   Effective July 23, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Actions and Penalties [75151. - 75156.]

75151.

It is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), or by both the fine and imprisonment, for any person to do any of the following:

(a) Willfully render or furnish a false report, statement, or record required by the commission.

(b) When engaged in the handling of eggs or egg products or in the wholesale or retail trade of the handling of eggs or egg products, fail or refuse to furnish to the commission or its duly authorized agents, upon request, information concerning the name and address of the persons from whom eggs or egg products have been received and the quantity so received.

(c) Secrete, destroy, or alter records required to be kept under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 121, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

75152.

(a) The commission shall establish procedures for the purpose of addressing any claims made against the commission or any of its individual members and alternates, and for the purpose of according individuals, including members and alternates, aggrieved by its actions or determinations an informal hearing before the commission or before a committee of the commission designated for that purpose.

(b) Appeals from decisions of the commission may be made to the director. The determination of the director is subject to judicial review upon petition filed with the appropriate superior court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75153.

(a) The commission may commence civil actions and utilize all remedies provided in law or equity for the collection of assessments and civil penalties, and for the obtaining of injunctive relief or specific performance, with respect to this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted under this chapter. A court shall issue to the commission any requested writ of attachment or injunctive relief upon a prima facie showing by verified complaint that a named defendant has violated this chapter or any other rule or regulation of the commission, including, but not limited to, the nonpayment of assessments. No bond shall be required to be posted by the commission as a condition for the issuance of any writ of attachment or injunctive relief. A writ of attachment shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 485.010) of Title 6.5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing specified by Section 485.010 is not required. Injunctive relief shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing of irreparable harm or of inadequate remedy at law specified by Section 526 or 527 is not required.

Upon entry of any final judgment on behalf of the commission against any defendant, the court shall enjoin the defendant from conducting any type of business regarding the commodity subject to this chapter until there is full compliance with and satisfaction of the judgment.

(b) Except in a proceeding to determine whether the director acted arbitrarily or capriciously in restricting the activities or functions of the commission, upon a favorable judgment for the commission, the commission is entitled to receive reimbursement for any reasonable attorney’s fees and other actual related costs.

(c) Venue for these actions may be established at the domicile or place of business of the defendant or in the county of the principal office of the commission. The commission may be sued only in the county of its principal office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 868, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

75154.

Any action for any penalty or other remedy which is prescribed under this chapter shall be commenced within two years from the date of the alleged violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75155.

It is not necessary for the commission to allege or prove that an adequate remedy at law does not exist in any action brought under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75156.

This chapter shall be liberally construed. If any section, clause, or part of this chapter is for any reason held to be unconstitutional or invalid as applied to any person or as applied under certain circumstances, that decision shall not affect the remaining portions of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any other persons or under any other circumstance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Continuation or Suspension and Termination [75171. - 75176.]

75171.

(a) Between January 1, 1989, and December 31, 1989, the commission shall conduct a referendum among handlers. A favorable vote under this chapter shall be found if the director determines from the referendum that a majority of the eligible handlers voting in the referendum voted in favor of continuing the operations of this chapter.

(b) If the director finds that a favorable vote has been given, he or she shall so certify and this chapter shall remain operative. If the director finds that a favorable vote has not been given, he or she shall so certify and declare the operation of this chapter and the commission suspended upon the expiration of the marketing season ending December 31, 1989. Thereupon, the operations of the commission shall be concluded and funds distributed in the manner provided in Section 75175.

(c) No bond or security is required for the referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 965, Sec. 12.   Effective September 10, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

75172.

(a) Following a favorable referendum conducted prior to December 31, 1989, a referendum shall be conducted by the commission every fifth year thereafter between January 1st and December 31st, following procedures provided in this article, unless a referendum is conducted as the result of a petition filed pursuant to Section 75173. In that case, the referendum shall be every fifth year following the industry-petitioned referendum.

(b) A favorable vote under this section shall be found if the secretary determines from the referendum that a majority of the handlers eligible to vote in the referendum voted in favor of continuing the operations of this chapter, or that the handlers so voting handled a majority or more of the volume of eggs or egg products handled in the preceding season by all of the handlers who voted in the referendum.

(c) If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has been given, he or she shall so certify and this chapter shall remain operative. If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has not been given, he or she shall so certify and declare the operation of this chapter and the commission suspended upon the expiration of the then current marketing season. Thereupon, the operations of the commission shall be concluded and funds distributed in the manner provided in Section 75175.

(d) No bond or security is required for a referendum conducted pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 121, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

75173.

(a) Upon a finding by a two-thirds vote of the commission that the operation of this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes, the commission may recommend to the secretary that the operation of this chapter be suspended. However, the suspension shall not become effective until the expiration of the current marketing season.

(b) The secretary shall, upon receipt of this recommendation, or may, after a public hearing to review a petition filed with him or her requesting the suspension, signed by 20 percent of the total number of handlers by number who handled not less than 20 percent of the volume of eggs and egg products handled in the immediately preceding marketing season, conduct a referendum among the handlers to determine if the operation of the commission shall be suspended. However, the secretary shall not hold a referendum as a result of the petition unless the petitioner shows by a preponderance of the evidence that the operation of this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purpose.

(c) The secretary shall establish a referendum period, which shall not be less than 10 or more than 60 days in duration. The secretary may prescribe additional procedures as may be necessary to conduct the referendum. At the close of the established referendum period, the secretary shall tabulate the ballots filed during the period.

(d) If at least 40 percent of the total number of handlers from the list established by the secretary participated in the referendum, the secretary shall suspend the operation of this chapter, if he or she finds either one of the following:

(1) Sixty-five percent or more of the total number of handlers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the handlers so voting handled a majority or more of the volume of eggs and egg products handled in the preceding marketing season by all of the handlers who voted in the referendum.

(2) A majority of the total number of handlers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the handlers so voting handled 65 percent or more of the volume of eggs and egg products handled in the preceding season by all of the handlers who voted in the referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 121, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

75174.

Prior to any referendum resulting from a petition filed in accordance with Section 75173, the petitioners shall deposit with the director an amount that the director deems necessary to defray the expenses of preparing the necessary lists and information and conducting the referendum. Any funds not used shall be returned to the petitioners who deposited the funds with the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75175.

(a) After the effective date of suspension of the operation of this chapter and of the commission, the operations of the commission shall be concluded and any and all remaining funds held by the commission, collected by assessment and not required to defray the expenses of concluding and terminating the operations of the commission, shall be returned upon a pro rata basis to all persons from whom assessments were collected in the immediately preceding marketing season.

(b) However, if the commission finds that the amounts so returnable are so small as to make impractical the computation and remitting of a pro rata refund to these persons, any such funds remaining and any funds remaining after payment of all expenses of winding up and terminating operations shall be withdrawn from the approved depository and paid into an appropriate state authorized eggs or egg products program. If no such program exists, the funds shall be paid into a federally authorized eggs or egg products program. If no such program exists, the funds shall be paid into the State Treasury as unclaimed trust money.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75176.

Upon suspension of the operation of this chapter and of the commission, the commission shall mail a copy of the notice of suspension to all handlers affected by the suspension whose names and addresses are on file.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1093, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13.5. California Apple Commission [75501. - 75656.]



  ARTICLE 1. Declarations and General Provisions [75501. - 75507.]

75501.

The production and marketing of apples constitute an important industry of this state which provides substantial and necessary revenues for the state and employment for its residents.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75502.

The maintenance of the apple industry of California is necessary to assure the public of a continuous supply of this vital food product and the maintenance of needed levels of income for those persons engaged in the industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75503.

The production and marketing of apples produced in this state are hereby declared to be affected with a public interest. This chapter is enacted in the exercise of the police power of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75504.

No action taken by the commission or by any individual in accordance with this chapter or with the regulations adopted under this chapter, is a violation of the Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), or any statutory or common law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 374, Sec. 4.   (AB 623)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

75505.

This chapter shall be liberally construed. If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------
